West Virginia, session 2025, SB360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. Authorization for Department of Transportation to promulgate legislative rules. §64-8-1. Division of Motor Vehicles. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 14, 2024, authorized under the authority of §17C-5A-3 of this code, relating to the Division of Motor Vehicles (Safety and Treatment Program, 91 CSR 15), is authorized.